Maryland, session 2025, HB1391.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
SUBTITLE 22. ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE IN EDUCATION.
7–2201.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3.5–801
OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(C) “CTE ADVISORY COMMITTEE” MEANS THE CTE SKILLS STANDARDS
ADVISORY COMMITTEE ESTABLISHED UNDER § 21–210 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(C) (D) “CTE COMMITTEE” MEANS THE CAREER AND TECHNICAL
EDUCATION COMMITTEE ESTABLISHED UNDER § 21–209 OF THIS ARTICLE.
7–2202.
(A) (1) ON OR BEFORE AUGUST 1, 2026, THE DEPARTMENT, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE STATE BOARD AND THE TASK FORCE ON ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE IN K–12 EDUCATION RELEVANT STAKEHOLDERS, SHALL DEVELOP
OR UPDATE K–12 GUIDANCE ON CLASSROOM USE AND IMPLEMENTATION OF
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE THAT:
(I) PROMOTES THE SAFE, RESPONSIBLE, AND ETHICAL USE OF
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE;
(II) EMPHASIZES STUDENTS AND TEACHERS AT THE CENTER OF
EDUCATIONAL TECHNOLOGY; AND
(III) PRIORITIZES THE EDUCATIONAL NEEDS OF STUDENTS
USING EVIDENCE–BASED APPROACHES AND METHODOLOGIES.

HOUSE BILL 1391 3
(2) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH OTHER INTERESTED
STAKEHOLDERS, SHALL PUBLISH ON ITS WEBSITE SEPARATE GUIDANCE FOR
STUDENTS, TEACHERS, AND ADMINISTRATORS.
(B) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP STRATEGIES TO ASSIST
COUNTY BOARDS AND COUNTY SUPERINTENDENTS TO IMPLEMENT THE
GUIDELINES, STANDARDS, AND BEST PRACTICES DEVELOPED BY THE DEPARTMENT
UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) (I) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY, SHALL DEVELOP AND ANNUALLY
UPDATE A LIST OF COMMONLY AVAILABLE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOOLS
APPROVED FOR USE IN SCHOOLS.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ENSURE THAT ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE TOOLS APPROVED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH
SAFEGUARD PRIVACY AND SECURITY.
(C) EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL DESIGNATE AN EMPLOYEE TO FACILITATE
THE PRODUCTIVE AND ETHICAL USE OF SYSTEMS OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE IN
THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM.
(D) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2025, THE CTE COMMITTEE SHALL
ENSURE THAT ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE LITERACY IS A COMPONENT OF
WORKFORCE PREPARATION.
(E) (1) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND
ASSOCIATION OF BOARDS OF EDUCATION, THE MARYLAND STATE EDUCATION
ASSOCIATION, AND THE PUBLIC SCHOOL SUPERINTENDENTS’ ASSOCIATION OF
MARYLAND, SHALL DEVELOP AND ADMINISTER A STATEWIDE ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE NEEDS ASSESSMENT TO DETERMINE THE CAPACITY OF LOCAL
SCHOOL SYSTEMS TO INTEGRATE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE.
(2) THE NEEDS ASSESSMENT SHOULD IDENTIFY WHETHER LOCAL
SCHOOL SYSTEMS NEED SUPPORT IN INTEGRATING ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE,
INCLUDING THE TYPE AND LEVEL OF SUPPORT.
(F) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, AND EACH JULY 1 THEREAFTER, EACH
COUNTY BOARD SHALL REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT ON:
(1) PRODUCTS THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM HAS PURCHASED IN THE
PRIOR SCHOOL YEAR THAT INCLUDE SIGNIFICANT USE OF ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE;

HOUSE BILL 1391
(2) USE OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TO ASSIST TEACHERS;
(3) USE OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TO ASSIST STUDENTS;
(4) RESULTS OF STUDENT PERFORMANCE DIRECTLY RELATED TO
THE USE OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE IN THE CLASSROOM; AND
(5) COMPLIANCE WITH STATE DATA PRIVACY LAWS.
(G) ON OR BEFORE AUGUST 1, 2026, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE RESULTS OF THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
NEEDS ASSESSMENT UNDER THIS SECTION.
(B) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PERIODICALLY UPDATE THE GUIDANCE
TO REFLECT CHANGES IN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, THE ETHICS THAT SURROUND
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, AND THE NEEDS OF STUDENTS, PARENTS, EDUCATORS,
AND ADMINISTRATORS.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONTINUE TO CONSULT WITH
REGULAR STAKEHOLDERS IN UPDATING THE GUIDANCE.
(C) (1) THE CTE COMMITTEE SHALL USE THE DEPARTMENT’S
GUIDANCE AND, IF NECESSARY, CONSULT WITH THE DEPARTMENT BEFORE
INCORPORATING THE USE OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE INTO THE STATEWIDE
FRAMEWORK FOR CTE.
(2) THE CTE ADVISORY COMMITTEE SHALL USE THE
DEPARTMENT’S GUIDANCE AND, IF NECESSARY, CONSULT WITH THE DEPARTMENT
BEFORE INCORPORATING THE USE OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE INTO THE
POST–CCR CTE PATHWAY THE CTE ADVISORY COMMITTEE RECOMMENDS TO THE
CTE COMMITTEE.
7–2203.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROMOTE TRAINING AND WORKFORCE
DEVELOPMENT IN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE.
(B) PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT IN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE FOR
TEACHERS AND ADMINISTRATORS SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) COURSES ON ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE;

HOUSE BILL 1391 5
(2) TRAINING FOR TEACHERS AND ADMINISTRATORS TO LEARN TO
TRAIN OTHER TEACHERS AND ADMINISTRATORS RELATED TO ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE; AND
(3) MONTHLY WEBINARS.
(C) FUNDS FOR PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT ON ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE FOR TEACHERS AND ADMINISTRATORS SHALL BE AS PROVIDED IN
THE STATE BUDGET.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) There is a Task Force on Artificial Intelligence in K–12 Education.
(b) The Task Force consists of the following members:
(1) the State Superintendent, or the State Superintendent’s designee;
(2) the Executive Director of the Maryland Association of Boards of
Education, or the Executive Director’s designee;
(3) the President of the Maryland State Education Association, or the
President’s designee;
(4) the President of the Maryland Association of School Personnel
Administrators, or the President’s designee;
(5) the Executive Director of the Public School Superintendents’
Association of Maryland, or the Executive Director’s designee;
(6) a teacher, student, or parent from each local school system, appointed
by the county superintendent; and
(7) the employees designated by the county boards under § 7–2202(c) of the
Education Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
(c) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the teachers appointed or
designated to the Task Force shall represent diverse subject areas.
(d) The State Superintendent of Schools shall designate the chair of the Task
Force from the Department and may establish subcommittees of the Task Force.
(e) The Department:
(1) shall provide staff for the Task Force; and

HOUSE BILL 1391
(2) may partner or contract with an organization to support the Task Force.
(f) A member of the Task Force:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Task Force; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(g) The Task Force shall:
(1) study the uses of artificial intelligence in each local school system,
including a review of innovation by industry and philanthropic support of schools in the
use of artificial intelligence; and
(2) make findings and recommendations regarding:
(i) the development or update of guidance and best practices for
county boards under § 7–2202 of the Education Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act;
(ii) the implementation of best practices for relevant professional
development;
(iii) the development and administration of the statewide artificial
intelligence needs assessment; and
(iv) the adoption of policies and procedures regarding the
development, procurement, implementation, utilization, and ongoing assessment of
systems that employ artificial intelligence by a county board.
(h) The Task Force shall coordinate with the Department, the CTE Committee,
and the CTE Skills Standards Advisory Committee to provide recommendations for
integrating artificial intelligence into the college and career readiness standards
established by the State Board under § 7–205.1 of the Education Article.
(i) On or before January 1, 2026, based on best practices from across the country,
the Task Force shall create a document with examples of artificial intelligence integrated
into curriculum, including examples for:
(1) elementary, middle, and high school curriculum; and
(2) all subject areas represented in the courses required for graduation.
(j) On or before December 1, 2026, the Task Force shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.

HOUSE BILL 1391 7
SECTION 3. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
June 1, 2025. Section 2 of this Act shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and 8 months
and, at the end of January 31, 2027, Section 2 of this Act, with no further action required
by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.